Washington statutes.
RCW 35.68.080

Construction of chapter.

This chapter is supplemental and additional to any and all other laws relating to construction, reconstruction, and repair of sidewalks, gutters, and curbs along driveways across sidewalks in cities and towns.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.68.080. Prior: 1949 c 177 s 8; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 9332h.]